California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) Arrivals and departures is the number of arrivals in and departures from airports within the state of certificated aircraft during the taxable year as compared to the total number of arrivals in and departures from airports both within this state and elsewhere during the taxable year. This factor shall be multiplied by 25 percent.

(c) The time in state factor shall be added to the arrivals and departures factor.

(d) The figure produced by application of subdivision (c) equals the allocation to be applied to the original cost of property owned or rented by the taxpayer determined under the provisions of Section 25130.

(e) If annual statistics for the taxpayer’s taxable
 year are not available, statistics for representative periods designated by the Franchise Tax Board shall be used provided that permission to do so has been granted to the taxpayer by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 214.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25102.

In the case of two or more persons, as defined in Section 19 of this code, owned or controlled directly or indirectly by the same interests, the Franchise Tax Board may permit or require the filing of a combined report and such other information as it deems necessary and is authorized to impose the tax due under this part as though the combined entire net income was that of one person, or to distribute, apportion, or allocate the gross income or deductions between or among such persons, if it determines that such consolidation, distribution, apportionment, or allocation is necessary in order to reflect the proper income of any such persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 273.)
-------------------------------------------

25103.

In the case of a corporation doing business within the meaning of this part, whether under agreement or otherwise, in such manner as either directly or indirectly to benefit the members or stockholders of the corporation, or any of them, or any person or persons, directly or indirectly interested in such business, by rendering services of any nature whatsoever, or acquiring or disposing of its products or the goods or commodities in which it deals, at less than a fair price therefore, the Franchise Tax Board, in order to prevent evasion of taxes or clearly to reflect the income of such corporation, may require a report of such facts as it deems necessary, and may
 determine the amount which shall be deemed to be the entire net income allocable to this State of the business of such corporation for the calendar or fiscal year, and compute the tax upon such net income. In determining the entire net income the Franchise Tax Board shall have regard to the fair profits which, but for any agreement, arrangement, or understanding, might be or could have been obtained from dealing in such products, goods or commodities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

25104.

In the case of a corporation liable to report under this part owning or controlling, either directly or indirectly, another corporation, or other corporations, and in the case of a corporation liable to report under this part and owned or controlled, either directly or indirectly, by another corporation, the Franchise Tax Board may require a consolidated report showing the combined net income or such other facts as it deems necessary. The Franchise Tax Board is authorized and empowered, in such manner as it may determine, to assess the tax against either of the corporations whose net income is involved in the report upon the basis of the combined entire net income and
 such other information as it may possess, or it may adjust the tax in such other manner as it shall determine to be equitable if it determines it to be necessary in order to prevent evasion of taxes or to clearly reflect the net income earned by said corporation or corporations from business done in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

25105.

(a) For purposes of this article, other than Section 25102, the income and apportionment factors of two or more corporations shall be included in a combined report only if the corporations, otherwise meeting the requirements of Section 25101 or 25101.15, are members of a commonly controlled group.

(b) A “commonly controlled group” means any of the following:

(1) A parent corporation and any one or more
 corporations or chains of corporations, connected through stock ownership (or constructive ownership) with the parent, but only if—

(A) The parent owns stock possessing more than 50 percent of the voting power of at least one corporation, and, if applicable,

(B) Stock cumulatively representing more than 50 percent of the voting power of each of the corporations, except the parent, is owned by the parent, one or more corporations described in subparagraph (A), or one or more other corporations that satisfy the conditions of this subparagraph.

(2) Any two or more corporations, if stock representing more than 50 percent of the voting power of the corporations is owned, or constructively owned, by the same person.

(3) Any two or more corporations that
 constitute stapled entities.

(A) For purposes of this paragraph, “stapled entities” means any group of two or more corporations if more than 50 percent of the ownership or beneficial ownership of the stock possessing voting power in each corporation consists of stapled interests.

(B) Two or more interests are stapled interests if, by reason of form of ownership restrictions on transfer, or other terms or conditions, in connection with the transfer of one of the interests the other interest or interests are also transferred or required to be transferred.

(4) Any two or more corporations, all of whose stock representing more than 50 percent of the voting power of the corporations is cumulatively owned (without regard to the constructive ownership rules of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e)) by, or for the benefit of,
 members of the same family. Members of the same family are limited to an individual, his or her spouse, parents, brothers or sisters, grandparents, children and grandchildren, and their respective spouses.

(c) (1) If, in the application of subdivision (b), a corporation is eligible to be treated as a member of more than one commonly controlled group of corporations, the corporation shall elect to be treated as a member of only one commonly controlled group. This election shall remain in effect unless revoked with the approval of the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) Membership in a commonly controlled group shall be treated as terminated in any year, or fraction thereof, in which the conditions of subdivision (b) are not met, except as follows:

(A) When stock of a corporation is sold, exchanged, or
 otherwise disposed of, the membership of a corporation in a commonly controlled group shall not be terminated, if the requirements of subdivision (b) are again met immediately after the sale, exchange, or disposition.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board may treat the commonly controlled group as remaining in place if the conditions of subdivision (b) are again met within a period not to exceed two years.

(d) A taxpayer may exclude some or all corporations included in a “commonly controlled group” by reason of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) by showing that those members of the group are not controlled directly or indirectly by the same interests, within the meaning of the same phrase in Section 482 of the Internal Revenue Code. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “controlled” includes any kind of control, direct or indirect, whether legally enforceable, and however exercisable or
 exercised.

(e) Except as otherwise provided, stock is “owned” when title to the stock is directly held or if the stock is constructively owned.

(1) An individual constructively owns stock that is owned by any of the following:

(A) His or her spouse.

(B) Children, including adopted children, of that individual or the individual’s spouse, who have not attained the age of 21 years.

(C) An estate or trust, of which the individual is an executor, trustee, or grantor, to the extent that the estate or trust is for the benefit of that individual’s spouse or children.

(2) Stock owned by a corporation, or a member of a controlled group
 of which the corporation is the parent corporation, is constructively owned by any shareholder owning stock that represents more than 50 percent of the voting power of the corporation.

(3) Stock owned by a partnership is constructively owned by any partner, other than a limited partner, in proportion to the partner’s capital interest in the partnership. For this purpose, a partnership is treated as owning proportionately the stock owned by any other partnership in which it has a tiered interest, other than as a limited partner.

(4) In any case where a member of a commonly controlled group, or shareholders, officers, directors, or employees of a member of a commonly controlled group, is a general partner in a limited partnership, stock held by the limited partnership is constructively owned by a limited partner to the extent of its capital interest in the limited partnership.

(f) For purposes of this section, each of the following shall apply:

(1) “Corporation” means a subchapter S corporation, any other incorporated entity, or any entity defined or treated as a corporation pursuant to Section 23038 or 23038.5.

(2) “Person” means an individual, a trust, an estate, a qualified employee benefit plan, a limited partnership, or a corporation.

(3) “Voting power” means the power of all classes of stock entitled to vote that possess the power to elect the membership of the board of directors of the corporation.

(4) “More than 50 percent of the voting power” means voting power sufficient to elect a majority of the membership of the board of directors of the
 corporation.

(5) “Stock representing voting power” includes stock where ownership is retained but the actual voting power is transferred in either of the following manners:

(A) For one year or less.

(B) By proxy, voting trust, written shareholder agreement, or by similar device, where the transfer is revocable by the transferor.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including, but not limited to, regulations that do the following:

(1) Prescribe terms and conditions relating to the election described by subdivision (c), and the revocation thereof.

(2) Disregard transfers of voting power not described by paragraph (5) of subdivision (f).

(3) Treat entities not described by paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) as a person.

(4) Treat warrants, obligations convertible into stock, options to acquire or sell stock, and similar instruments as stock.

(5) Treat holders of a beneficial interest in, or executor or trustee powers over, stock held by an estate or trust as constructively owned by the holder.

(6) Prescribe rules relating to the treatment of partnership agreements which authorize a particular partner or partners to exercise voting power of stock held by the partnership.

(h) This section shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 215.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25106.

(a) (1) In any case in which the income of a corporation is or has been determined under this chapter with reference to the income and apportionment factors of one or more other corporations with which it is doing or has done a unitary business, all dividends paid by one to another of any of those corporations shall, to the extent those dividends are paid out of the income previously described of the unitary business, be eliminated from the income of the recipient and, except for purposes of applying Section 24345,
 shall not be taken into account under Section 24344 or in any other manner in determining the tax of any member of the unitary group.

(2) (A) For purposes of this section, the dividends described in paragraph (1) include dividends paid out of the income previously described of the unitary business by a member of the unitary group to a corporation formed subsequent to the accrual of the income, if the recipient corporation was part of the unitary group during the period from its formation to its receipt of those dividends.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board may deny any dividend elimination for the dividends described in this paragraph if the board determines that a transaction is entered into or structured with a principal purpose of evading the tax imposed by this part.

(3) For purposes of this
 section, “income previously described of the unitary business” shall include income earned by members of the unitary group during taxable years when no member of the unitary group was taxable in this state to the extent that the income of the unitary group would have been determined under this chapter had any member of the corporation’s unitary group been subject to tax in this state at the time that income was earned.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe any regulations that may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purpose of this section, which is to prevent taxation of dividends received by a member of a unitary group where those dividends were paid from the income previously described of the unitary business by another member of the same unitary group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 305, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Note: See Sec. 14 of Ch. 305.)
-------------------------------------------

25106.5.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations necessary to ensure that the tax liability or net income of any taxpayer whose income derived from or attributable to sources within this state which is required to be determined by a combined report pursuant to Section 25101 or 25110 of this chapter, and of each entity included in the combined report, both during and after the period of inclusion in the combined report is properly reported , determined, computed, assessed, collected, or adjusted.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board shall
 not adopt regulations under the authority of this section which shall in any manner determine, prescribe, or otherwise affect (1) the inclusion or exclusion in the combined report of those entities whose income and apportionment factors are to be taken into account pursuant to Sections 25101 and 25110 of this chapter, or (2) after the period of inclusion, cause the income or expenses of an entity which is excluded from a combined report pursuant to Sections 25101 and 25110 of this part to be included in a combined report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 258, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

25107.

(a) For the purposes of allocation and apportionment of income under Sections 25101 and 25121, an international banking facility maintained by a bank within California shall be considered doing business without the state. Intangible personal property and sales reflected on the segregated books and records recognized by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System as attributable to the international banking facility shall be attributed to that international banking facility
 in determining the property, payroll, and sales factors of the bank.

(b) As used in this section, “bank” means a commercial bank, the principal office of which is located in this state and which is incorporated and doing business under the laws of the United States or of this state, a United States branch or agency of a foreign bank, an Edge corporation organized under Section 25 (a) of the Federal Reserve Act, 12 United States Code 611-631, or an Agreement corporation having an agreement or undertaking with the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System under Section 25 of the Federal Reserve Act, 12 United States Code 601-604 (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1352, Sec. 155.   Effective October 2, 1989.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, by Sec. 172 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

25108.

(a) For corporations whose income is subject to the provisions of Section 25101 or 25101.15, the net operating loss determined in accordance with Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code for a particular taxable year shall be the corporation’s “net loss for state purposes” as defined in subdivision (c).

(b) The net operating loss deduction allowed by Sections 24416, 24416.1, and 24416.2, for a taxable year shall be deducted from “net income for state purposes” (as defined
 in subdivision (c)) for that taxable year.

(c) “Net income (loss) for state purposes” means the sum of the net income or loss of that corporation apportionable to this state and the income or loss allocable to this state as nonbusiness income, as provided by Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 216.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Water's-Edge Election [25110. - 25116.]

25110.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 25101, a qualified taxpayer, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), that is subject to the tax imposed under this part, may elect to determine its income derived from or attributable to sources within this state pursuant to a water’s-edge election in accordance with the provisions of this part, as modified by this article. A taxpayer, that makes a water’s-edge election on or after January 1, 2006, shall take into account that portion of its own income and apportionment factors and the income and apportionment factors of its affiliated entities to the extent provided below:

(1) The entire income and apportionment factors of any of the following
 corporations:

(A) Domestic international sales corporations, as described in Sections 991 to 994, inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) Any corporation (other than a bank), regardless of the place where it is incorporated if the average of its property, payroll, and sales factors within the United States is 20 percent or more.

(C) Corporations that are incorporated in the United States, excluding corporations making an election pursuant to Sections 931 to 934, inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code.

(D) Export trade corporations, as described in Sections 970 and 971 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) (A) With respect to a corporation that is not described in subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (1), as provided in either one or both of the following clauses:

(i) The income and apportionment factors of that corporation to the extent of its income derived from or attributable to sources within the United States and its factors assignable to a location within the United States in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (b). Income of that corporation derived from or attributable to sources within the United States as determined by federal income tax laws shall be limited to, and determined from, the books of account maintained by the corporation with respect to its activities conducted within the United States.

(ii) The income
 and apportionment factors of that corporation that is a “controlled foreign corporation,” as defined in Section 957 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to controlled foreign corporations; United States persons, to the extent determined by multiplying the income and apportionment factors of that corporation without application of this subparagraph by a fraction not to exceed one, the numerator of which is the “Subpart F income” of that corporation for that taxable year and the denominator of which is the “earnings and profits” of that corporation for that taxable year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, both of the following apply:

(i) “Subpart F income” means “Subpart F income” as defined in Section 952 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) “Earnings and profits” means “earnings and profits” as described in Section 964 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to miscellaneous provisions.

(3) The income and apportionment factors of the corporations described in this subdivision shall be taken into account only to the extent that they would have been taken into account had no election under this section been made.

(4) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe regulations to coordinate implementation of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) to prevent multiple inclusion or exclusion of income and factors in situations where the same item of income is described in both clauses.

(b) For purposes of this article and Section 24411, all of the following
 definitions apply:

(1) An “affiliated corporation” means a corporation that is a member of a commonly controlled group as defined in Section 25105.

(2) A “qualified taxpayer” means a corporation that does both of the following:

(A) Files with the state tax return, on which the water’s-edge election is made, a consent to the taking of depositions, at the time and place most reasonably convenient to all parties, from key domestic corporate individuals and to the acceptance of subpoenas duces tecum requiring reasonable production of documents to the Franchise Tax Board, as provided in Section 19504, by the Office of Tax Appeals, as provided in Division 4.1 (commencing with Section 30000) of Title 18 of the California
 Code of Regulations, or by the courts of this state, as provided in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1985) of Title 3 of Part 4 of, and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2025.010) of Title 4 of Part 4 of, the Code of Civil Procedure. The consent relates to issues of jurisdiction and service and does not waive any defenses that a taxpayer may otherwise have. The consent shall remain in effect as long as the water’s-edge election is in effect, and shall be limited to providing that information necessary to review or adjust income or deductions in a manner authorized by Section 482, 861, Subpart F of Part III of Subchapter N, or similar provisions, of the Internal Revenue Code, together with the regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions, and for the conduct of an investigation with respect to any unitary business in which the taxpayer may be involved.

(B) Agrees that, for purposes of this article, dividends received by any corporation whose income and apportionment factors are taken into account pursuant to subdivision (a) from either of the following are functionally related dividends and shall be presumed
 to be business income:

(i) A corporation of which more than 50 percent of the voting stock is owned, directly or indirectly, by members of the unitary group and which is engaged in the same general line of business.

(ii) Any corporation that is either a significant source of supply for the unitary business or a significant purchaser of the output of the unitary business, or that sells a significant part of its output or obtains a significant part of its raw materials or input from the unitary business. “Significant,” as used in this subparagraph, means an amount of 15 percent or more of either input or output.

All other dividends shall be classified as business or nonbusiness income without regard to this subparagraph.

(3) The definitions and locations of property, payroll, and sales shall be determined under the laws and regulations that set forth the apportionment formulas used by the individual states to assign net income subject to taxes on, or measured by, net income in that state. If a state does not impose a tax on, or measured by, net income or does not have laws or regulations with respect to the assignment of property, payroll, and sales, the laws and regulations provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) shall apply.

Sales shall be considered to be made to a state only if the corporation making the sale may otherwise be subject to a tax on, or measured by, net income under the Constitution or laws of the United States, and shall not include sales made to a corporation whose income
 and apportionment factors are taken into account pursuant to subdivision (a) in determining the amount of income of the taxpayer derived from or attributable to sources within this state.

(4) “The United States” means the 50 states of the United States and the District of Columbia.

(c) All references in this part to income determined pursuant to Section 25101 shall also mean income determined pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 45.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

25111.

(a) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2003, the making of a water’s-edge election as provided for in Section 25110 shall be made by contract with the Franchise Tax Board in the original return for a year and shall be effective only if every taxpayer that is a member of the water’s-edge group and which is subject to tax under this part makes the election. A single taxpayer that is engaged in more than one business activity subject to allocation and
 apportionment as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 25120) of Chapter 17 may make a separate election for each business. The form and manner of making the water’s-edge election shall be prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. Each contract making a water’s-edge election shall be for an initial term of 84 months, except as provided in subdivision (b). Each contract shall provide that on the anniversary date of the contract or any other annual date specified by the contract a year shall be added automatically to the initial term unless notice of nonrenewal is given as provided in subdivision (d). An affiliated corporation that is a member of the water’s-edge group and subsequently becomes subject to tax under this part or is a nonelecting taxpayer that is subsequently proved to be a member of the water’s-edge group pursuant to a Franchise Tax Board audit determination, as evidenced by a notice of deficiency proposed to be assessed or a notice of tax change, shall be deemed to have elected.

No water’s-edge election shall be made for a taxable year beginning prior to January 1, 1988.

(b) A water’s-edge election may be terminated by a taxpayer prior to the end of the 84-month period if either of the following occurs:

(1) The taxpayer is acquired directly or indirectly by a nonelecting entity which alone or together with those affiliates included in its combined report is larger than the taxpayer as measured by equity capital.

(2) With the permission of the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) In granting a change of election, the Franchise Tax Board shall impose any conditions that are necessary to prevent the avoidance of tax or to clearly reflect income for the period the election was, or was purported to be, in
 effect. These conditions may include a requirement that income, including dividends paid from income earned while a water’s-edge election was in effect, which would have been included in determining the income of the taxpayer from sources within and without this state pursuant to Section 25101 but for the water’s-edge election shall be included in income in the year in which the election is changed.

(d) If the taxpayer desires in any year not to renew the election, the taxpayer shall serve written notice of nonrenewal upon the board at least 90 days in advance of the annual renewal date. Unless that written notice is provided to the board, the election shall be considered renewed as provided in subdivision (a).

(e) If the taxpayer serves notice of intent in any year not to renew the existing water’s-edge election, that existing election shall remain in effect for the balance of
 the period remaining since the original election or the last renewal of the election, as the case may be.

(f) To the extent that a taxpayer would have been required to file on a water’s-edge basis in its first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2003, pursuant to a water’s-edge election made in a prior year under this section, the terms of this section no longer apply and that election shall be deemed to have been made under the terms of Section 25113. However, the commencement date of the election made in a prior year under this section shall continue to be treated as the commencement date of the water’s-edge election period for purposes of applying the provisions of Section 25113.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 633, Sec. 9.   Effective September 30, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25111.1.

(a) For any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, consideration for water’s-edge contracts in existence as of that date is no longer provided for by law. Contracts entered into for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 1994, are rescinded for any periods remaining on those contracts commencing on the first day of the taxpayer’s first taxable year that begins on or after January 1, 1994. Any fiscal year taxpayer whose contract is in effect as of December 31, 1993, shall continue to be bound by that contract until
 the close of its taxable year after January 1, 1994, and before December 31, 1994.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), and except for the purposes of Section 25115, all taxpayers that are members of a water’s-edge group consisting of taxpayers with different taxable years shall continue to be bound by the contract in effect as of December 31, 1993, until the taxable year beginning prior to January 1, 1994, and ending in 1994 for each of the taxpayer members of the water’s-edge group has ended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 219.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25112.

(a) If a taxpayer electing to file under Section 25110 fails to supply any information described in subdivision (b), the taxpayer shall pay a penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each taxable year with respect to which the failure occurs.

(b) A taxpayer electing to file pursuant to Section 25110 shall do all of the following:

(1) Retain and make available to the Franchise Tax Board, upon request, the
 documents and information, including any questionnaires completed and submitted to the Internal Revenue Service or qualified states, that are necessary to audit issues involving attribution of income to the United States or foreign jurisdictions under Sections 482, 861, 863, 902, and 904, and Subpart F of Part III of Subchapter N, or similar sections of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Identify, upon request, principal officers or employees who have substantial knowledge of, and access to, documents and records that discuss pricing policies, profit centers, cost centers, and the methods of allocating income and expense among these centers. The information shall include the employees’ titles and addresses.

(3) Retain and make available, upon request, all documents and correspondence ordinarily available to a corporation included in the water’s-edge election that are submitted to, or
 obtained from, the Internal Revenue Service, foreign countries or their territories or possessions, and competent authority pertaining to ruling requests, rulings, settlement resolutions, and competing claims involving jurisdictional assignment and sourcing of income that affect the assignment of income to the United States. The documents shall include all ruling requests and rulings on reorganizations involving foreign incorporation of branches, all ruling requests and rulings on changing a corporation’s jurisdictional incorporation, and all documents that are ordinarily available to a corporation included in the water’s-edge election that pertain to the determination of foreign tax liability, including examination reports issued by foreign taxing administrations. If the documents have been translated, the translations shall be furnished.

(4) Retain and make available, upon request, information filed with the Internal Revenue Service to comply
 with Sections 6038, 6038A, 6038B, 6038C, and 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(5) Upon request, prepare and make available for each corporation organized or created under the laws of the United States or a political subdivision thereof, of which 50 percent or more of its voting stock is directly or indirectly owned or controlled, the information that would be included in the forms described in paragraph (4) if those forms were required for United States corporations.

(6) Retain and make available, upon request, all state tax returns filed by each corporation included under subdivision (a) in each state, including the District of Columbia.

(7) Comply with reasonable requests for information necessary to determine or verify its net income, apportionment factors, or the geographic source of that income pursuant to the
 Internal Revenue Code.

(8) For purposes of this subdivision, information for any year shall be retained for that period of time in which the taxpayer’s income or franchise tax liability to this state may be subject to adjustment, including all periods in which additional income or franchise taxes may be assessed or during which an appeal is pending before the State Board of Equalization or a lawsuit is pending in the courts of this state or the United States with respect to California franchise or income tax.

(c) If the failure continues for more than 90 days after the date on which the Franchise Tax Board mails notice of that failure to the taxpayer, the taxpayer shall pay a penalty (in addition to the amount required under subdivision (a)) of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each 30-day period (or fraction thereof) during which the failure continues after the expiration of the
 90-day period. The increase in any penalty under this subdivision shall not exceed twenty-four thousand dollars ($24,000).

(d) If the taxpayer fails to comply substantially with any formal document request arising out of the examination of the tax treatment of any item (hereafter in this section referred to as the “examined item”) before the 90th day after the date of the mailing of the request, any court having jurisdiction of a civil proceeding in which the tax treatment of the examined item is an issue may, upon motion by the Franchise Tax Board, prohibit the introduction by the taxpayer of documentation covered by that request.

(e) For purposes of this section, the time in which information is to be furnished (and the beginning of the 90-day period after notice by the Franchise Tax Board) shall be treated as beginning not earlier than the last day on which reasonable cause
 existed for failure to furnish the information.

(f) This section shall not apply with respect to any requested documentation if the taxpayer establishes that the failure to provide the documentation, as requested by the Franchise Tax Board, is due to reasonable cause. For purposes of subdivision (d), the fact that a foreign jurisdiction would impose a civil or criminal penalty on the taxpayer (or any other person) for disclosing the requested documentation is not reasonable cause unless, after in-camera review of the documentation, the court finds otherwise.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term “formal document request” means any request (made after the normal request procedures have failed to produce the requested documentation) for the production of documentation that is mailed by registered or certified mail to the taxpayer at its last known address and that sets forth
 all of the following:

(1) The time and place for the production of the documentation.

(2) A statement of the reason the documentation previously produced (if any) is not sufficient.

(3) A description of the documentation being sought.

(4) The consequences to the taxpayer of the failure to produce the documentation described in this section.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, any taxpayer to whom a formal document request is mailed may begin a proceeding to quash that request not later than the 90th day after the date the request was mailed. In that proceeding, the Franchise Tax Board may seek to compel compliance with the request.

(i) The superior courts of the State of California for the Counties of Los Angeles, Sacramento, and San Diego, and for the City and County of San Francisco shall have jurisdiction to hear any proceeding brought under subdivision (h). An order denying the petition shall be deemed a final order that may be appealed.

The running of the 90-day period referred to in subdivision (c) shall be suspended during any period during which a proceeding brought under subdivision (h) is pending.

(j) For purposes of this section, “documentation” means any documentation which may be relevant or material to the tax treatment of the examined item.

(k) The Franchise Tax Board, and any court having jurisdiction over a proceeding under subdivision (g), may extend the 90-day period referred to in
 subdivision (b).

(l) If any corporation takes any action as provided in subdivision (h), the running of any period of limitations under Sections 19057 to 19067, inclusive (relating to the assessment and collection of tax), or under Section 19704 (relating to criminal prosecutions) with respect to that corporation shall be suspended for the period during which the proceedings under subdivision (h) and appeals thereto are pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 220.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25113.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (f), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2003, the election provided for in Section 25110 shall be made on an original, timely filed return for the year of the election. The election will be considered valid if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The tax is computed in a manner consistent with a water’s-edge election.

(2) A written notification of election is filed with the return on a form prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. Pursuant to regulations promulgated under this section, the Franchise Tax Board may accept
 the filing of other objective evidence that supports the conclusion that a water’s-edge election was intended in lieu of notification on the designated form.

(b) Except as otherwise provided, a water’s-edge election shall be effective only if made by every member of the self-assessed combined reporting group that is subject to taxation under this part.

(1) An election made on a group return of a self-assessed combined reporting group shall constitute an election by each taxpayer member included in that group return, unless one of those taxpayers files a separate return in which no election is made and paragraph (2) does not apply.

(2) A taxpayer that fails to make an election on its own timely filed original return
 shall be deemed to have elected if either of the following applies:

(A) It has a parent corporation that is an electing taxpayer that included the income and apportionment factors of the nonelecting taxpayer in the self-assessed combined reporting group reflected in the electing parent’s timely filed original return, including a group return.
